Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Chapter 4

Metropolitan Airport Authorities

42-4-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Metropolitan Airport Authority Act.”

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 1; T.C.A., § 42-701.

Cross-References. Authority to regulate passenger transportation services, title 7, ch. 51, part 10.

Contracts and mutual aid agreements, §6-54-601.

Loans for airports, title 4, ch. 31, part 6.

Municipal and regional airport authorities, title 42, ch. 3.

Mutual aid agreements, §6-54-307.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Airplanes and Airports, § 1.

Comparative Legislation. Metropolitan airport authorities:

Ala. Code §4-4-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 183.132 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §61-3-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 305.500 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 63-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 5.1-31 et seq.

Cited: Millennium Taxi Serv., LLC v. Chattanooga Metro. Airport Auth., — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 413 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 30, 2009).

Collateral References. Aviation
8, 9.

42-4-102. Declaration of purpose and necessity — Exemption from taxation.

It is declared that airport authorities created pursuant to this chapter shall be public and governmental bodies acting as agencies and instrumentalities of the creating and participating municipalities, and that the acquiring, operating and financing of airports and related facilities by such airport authorities are declared to be for a public and governmental purpose and matters of public necessity.

The property and revenues of the authority or any interest therein shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 2; T.C.A., § 42-702.

Attorney General Opinions. Tax-exempt fuel provided by metropolitan airport authority to independent contractor operating local transit service, OAG 03-094 (7/28/03).

42-4-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Airport” means and includes any one (1) or more airports or heliports and related facilities, including, but not limited to, land and interests in land, facilities for storage of air and space craft, navigation and landing aids, taxiways, pads, aprons, control towers, passenger and cargo terminal buildings, hangars, administration and office buildings, garages, parking lots, and such other structures, facilities and improvements necessary or convenient to the development and maintenance of airports and heliports, and for the promotion and accommodation of air and space travel, commerce and navigation;

“Authority” means a metropolitan airport authority created pursuant to this chapter;

“Board” means the board of commissioners of an authority;

“Bonds” includes notes, interim certificates or other obligations of an authority;

“Carrier” means any person or corporation engaged in the air or space transportation of passengers or cargo;

“Creating municipality” means any city or metropolitan government having a population of not less than one hundred thousand (100,000), or any county in which any such city shall be situated, that shall create an authority pursuant to this chapter;

“Executive officer” means the mayor, county executive, or other chief executive officer of any creating or participating municipality;

“Governing body” means the chief legislative body of any creating or participating municipality;

“Participating municipality” means any city, town or county; which city, town or county, pursuant to a resolution of its governing body and an agreement with the creating municipality, has sold, leased, dedicated, donated or otherwise conveyed its airport to the authority for operation by the authority in order to make the airport an operational part of its airport system; and

“State” means the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 3; T.C.A., § 42-703.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

42-4-104. Creation of a metropolitan airport authority.

Any city or metropolitan government having a population of not less than one hundred thousand (100,000), or any county including any such city, may create a metropolitan airport authority in the manner provided in this section.

The governing body of the creating municipality shall adopt, and its executive officer shall approve, a resolution calling a public hearing on the question of creating an authority.

Notice of the date, hour, place and purpose of the hearing shall be published at least once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the creating municipality, the last such publication to be at least one (1) week prior to the date set for the hearing.

The hearing shall be had before the governing body and all interested persons shall have an opportunity to be heard.

After the hearing, if the governing body determines that the public convenience and necessity require the creation of an authority, it shall adopt, and its executive officer shall approve, a resolution so declaring and creating an authority, which resolution shall also designate the name and principal office address of the authority.

A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the department of transportation, together with the resolution approving the appointment of the board as provided in § 42-4-105, and, upon adoption and filing, the authority shall constitute a body politic and corporate, with all the powers provided in this chapter.

A certified copy of the resolution shall also be filed with the administrator of the federal aviation administration.

Whenever an authority is created under this chapter, the creating municipality and any participating municipality shall enter into an agreement with the authority for the orderly transfer to the authority of the airport properties, functions, and outstanding obligations of the municipalities.

The agreement may include provisions for the reimbursement to any such municipality for its obligations issued for airport purposes, and the agreement may also include provisions for the payment of tax equivalents by the authority and its lessees on all or any part of the properties owned by the authority and any improvements owned by the authority or its lessees to the principal and/or participating municipalities.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 16; T.C.A., § 42-704.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

42-4-105. Governing body.

The governing body of the authority shall be a board of commissioners of seven (7) persons appointed by the executive officer of the creating municipality and approved by its governing body, at least five (5) of whom shall be residents of the creating municipality, who shall have no financial interest in an airport or its concessions.

The governing body of the authority in any county having a metropolitan form of government shall be a board of commissioners of ten (10) persons appointed by the executive officer of such creating municipality and approved by its governing body, who shall have no financial interest in an airport or its concessions, at least seven (7) of whom shall be residents of such county having a metropolitan form of government. Of the ten (10) persons appointed, at least one (1) shall be a female and one (1) shall be black. However, a black female shall not satisfy the requirement of one (1) female and one (1) black. The new position on the board of commissioners provided for by Acts 1988, ch. 887, shall be the mayor of the county having a metropolitan form of government or the mayor's designee. This commissioner shall have full voting rights on the board. This subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall not apply to any county having a population in excess of seven hundred thousand (700,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, even if the county in the future adopts a metropolitan form of government.

The governing body of the authority of an airport that has regularly scheduled commercial passenger service, located in a county other than the county where the creating municipality is located, shall be a board of commissioners of nine (9) persons who shall have no financial interest in an airport or its concessions, to be appointed by the executive officer of the creating municipality and approved by its governing body, at least six (6) of whom shall be residents of the creating municipality, and three (3) of whom shall be residents outside of the creating municipality; provided, that at least one (1) is a resident of the county in which the airport is located.

The governing body of the authority located in a county that borders only one (1) other state, and which county contains at least ten (10) cities, shall be a board of commissioners of nine (9) persons of good standing and reputation appointed by the executive officer of the creating municipality, and approved by its governing body, who shall have no financial interest in an airport or its concessions, at least five (5) of whom shall be residents of that county. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no other restrictions shall apply to the membership of the board of commissioners or their qualifications. Members of the board shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

In the process of selecting, nominating, and choosing the members to serve on the board of the authority, the mayor shall review all candidates when making appointments to assure that full consideration has been given to each appointment and has considered age, gender and race, and further that appropriate balance should be given to each consideration. The purpose of the review is to assure inclusion in the operation of the authority.

Further, members of the legislative delegation shall be given quarterly reports or briefings of the activities and plans and conditions of the authority, and any proposals for capital expansion or improvements shall be given to the legislative delegation prior to the expansion or improvements.

Except as provided in subdivisions (a)(1)(D), (a)(2)(B) and (a)(2)(C), the boards of commissioners shall include a person of good standing and reputation in each of the following fields: engineering, law, industry or commerce, and finance.

However, in any county with a population in excess of eight hundred twenty-five thousand (825,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the boards of commissioners may include, but are not limited to, a person of good standing and reputation in each of the following fields: engineering, law, industry or commerce, and finance.

Four (4) seats on the governing body of the authority of an airport that has regularly scheduled commercial passenger service, located in a county other than the county where the creating municipality is located, shall be filled by persons of good standing and reputation in one (1) of the following five (5) fields: engineering, law, industry, commerce and finance.

Not less than two (2) of the commissioners shall hold airman's certificates issued by the federal aviation administration. The required certificates shall be private pilot's rating or a higher pilot rating; student certificates shall not satisfy the requirements. The engineer shall be an engineer licensed to practice in the state and shall have actively practiced such profession for the preceding five (5) years. The lawyer shall be licensed to practice before the highest court in the state and shall have been so licensed for a period of not less than five (5) years. The commissioners appointed from the fields of industry, commerce and finance shall be eminently qualified in their particular fields of endeavor. All commissioners shall be of excellent character and reputation.

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2), if there is one (1) participating municipality, one (1) member of the board shall be appointed by the executive officer of the creating municipality and approved by its governing body from the person or persons nominated by the executive officer of the participating municipality. If there are two (2) or more participating municipalities, up to two (2) members of the board, but not exceeding two (2), may be appointed by the executive officer of the creating municipality and approved by its governing body from the persons nominated by each of the executive officers of the participating municipalities. No commissioner shall be an officer or employee of the creating municipality or a participating municipality.

If the airport authority is located in a county with a population in excess of eight hundred twenty-five thousand (825,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, then two (2) members of the seven-member board shall be among the nominees of the executive officer of the participating county, and approved by the executive officer and governing body of the creating municipality.

Commissioners first appointed to the board shall be appointed for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4), five (5), six (6) and seven (7) years, respectively, but thereafter each commissioner shall be appointed for a term of seven (7) years.

The additional two (2) commissioners first appointed to the board pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) in any county having a metropolitan form of government shall be appointed for terms of six (6) and seven (7) years, respectively, but thereafter each such commissioner shall be appointed for a term of seven (7) years. At least one (1) member of the board appointed under subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall be a minority. Based upon the Metro Airport Authority's Noise Abatement Report compiled from population figures per the metro planning commission, those persons living within three (3) miles from the end of the north/south runway and the southeast/northwest runway are those persons most adversely impacted by air traffic noise. Therefore, the two (2) additional positions created by subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall be filled by persons who, at the time of appointment, are domiciled within five (5) miles of the end of those runways previously described and shall continue to be domiciled within this five-mile radius throughout their terms. This subdivision (d)(1)(B) shall not apply to any county having a population in excess of seven hundred thousand (700,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, even if such county in the future adopts a metropolitan form of government.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, the commissioners appointed to the board pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) on and after July 1, 1988, in any county having a metropolitan form of government shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years.

Any vacancy by reason of nonresidence, incapacity, resignation or death shall be filled in like manner for the unexpired term.

A commissioner's term shall continue until the appointment and qualification of a successor.

A commissioner may be removed from office by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of the creating municipality, but only after notice of the cause of such removal has been served upon the commissioner, and only after the commissioner has been granted an opportunity for a public hearing on the cause.

The board shall elect from among its members a chair, vice chair, and secretary, each of whom shall continue to be voting members, and shall adopt its own bylaws and rules of procedure. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Except as expressly otherwise specified in this chapter, all powers granted to an authority by this chapter shall be exercised by the board.

Commissioners shall receive no salary but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 5; T.C.A., § 42-705; Acts 1984, ch. 853, § 1; 1986, ch. 745, §§ 1-4; 1988, ch. 887, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 909, § 1; 1990, ch. 1080, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 328, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 640, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 155, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 562, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 562, § 2 provided:

“To facilitate the transition to a nine-member board from the current eleven-member board, the chief executive of the creating municipality may dissolve the current board and appoint a new board. Three (3) appointees to the newly appointed board shall be appointed for terms of one (1) year, three (3) for two (2) years, and three (3) for three (3) years, but thereafter each commissioner shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. All appointments shall be subject to the approval of the governing body of the creating municipality.”

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

42-4-106. Officers.

The board shall appoint a president, who shall be the chief executive and administrative officer of the authority, and shall enter into a contract with the president establishing salary and term of office.

The president shall appoint, and the board shall confirm, the following additional officers: secretary, auditor, legal counsel, treasurer and chief engineer.

All other officers and employees of the authority shall be appointed by the president, subject to any civil service plan adopted by the board.

The president shall prepare annually the operating budget of the authority and submit the budget to the board for approval at least sixty (60) days prior to the beginning of the fiscal year.

If the budget has not been acted upon by the board on the first day of the fiscal year, it shall then automatically go into effect.

The president shall also submit such periodic reports to the board as it may direct.

The president shall attend all meetings of the board.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 6; T.C.A., § 42-706.

42-4-107. General powers.

An authority has all powers necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter (excluding the power to levy and collect taxes and special assessments) including, but not limited to, the power to:

Have perpetual succession, sue and be sued, and adopt a corporate seal;

Plan, establish, acquire, construct, improve and operate one (1) or more airports within or without the creating municipality and within this state and within any adjoining state;

Acquire real or personal property or any interest in real or personal property by gift, lease, or purchase, for any of the purposes provided by this chapter, including the elimination, prevention or marking of airport hazards, and sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any such property; and acquire real property or any interest in real property in areas most affected by aircraft noise for the purpose of resale or lease, subject to restrictions limiting its use to industrial or other purposes least affected by aircraft noise;

Enter into agreements with the creating municipality and with participating municipalities, acquire by lease, gift, purchase, or otherwise, any airport of a creating or participating municipality and operate the airport as a part of its metropolitan airport;

Enter into agreements with the creating municipality and participating municipalities with respect to the manner of transfer of airport employees of the municipalities to the authority, and with respect to the retention by such employees of existing civil service status and accrued pension, disability, hospitalization and death benefits;

Enter into, by contract with the creating municipality or otherwise, a plan of civil service for employees of the authority;

Enter into, by contract with the creating municipality or otherwise, a plan for pension, disability, hospitalization and death benefits for the officers and employees of the authority;

Make application directly to the proper federal, state, county and municipal officials and agencies, or to any other source, public or private, for loans, grants, guarantees or other financial assistance in aid of airports operated by it, and to accept the loans, grants, guarantees or other financial assistance;

Make studies and recommend to the appropriate legislative body of the creating and participating municipalities or other municipality or county in which an airport is situated, zoning changes in the area of any airport operated by the authority with respect to noise, height and aviation obstructions;

Have control of its airport with the right and duty to establish and charge fees, rentals, rates and other charges, and collect revenues therefrom, not inconsistent with the rights of the holders of its bonds, and to enter into agreements with carriers for the payment of landing fees, rental rates and other charges;

Appoint a president, and confirm or reject the president's appointments of a secretary, a treasurer, an auditor, legal counsel and a chief engineer; prescribe their duties and qualifications; and fix their compensation;

Use in the performance of its functions the officers, agents, employees, services, facilities, records and equipment of the creating municipality or any participating municipality, with the consent of any such municipality, and subject to such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon;

Enter upon such lands, waters or premises as in the judgment of the authority may be necessary for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, borings and examinations to accomplish any purpose authorized by this chapter, the authority to be liable for actual damage done;

Provide its own fire protection, police and crash and rescue service;

Contract with carriers with regard to the landing, accommodation and servicing of aircraft; the loading and unloading of cargo, passengers and baggage; and the accommodation of the employees and passengers of the carriers;

Contract with persons or corporations to provide goods and services for the use of the employees and passengers of the carriers and the employees of the authority, and necessary and incidental to the operation of the airport;

Designate an independent certified public accounting firm to do an annual post audit of all books, accounts and records of the authority and issue a public report on the books, accounts and records;

Lend the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and enter into loan agreements or other agreements with persons or corporations with respect to the loans and the construction, reconstruction, improvement, or acquisition of one (1) or more projects at its airports, upon such terms and conditions as the authority may deem advisable; provided, that this subdivision (18) only applies in any county having a population of not less than seven hundred seventy thousand (770,000) nor more than seven hundred eighty thousand (780,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

Incorporate, operate in all respects, and exercise all the powers granted to industrial development corporations under title 7, chapter 53; provided, that the creating municipality, and participating municipality if the airport is located in or owned by a participating municipality, grants such power to the airport authority by resolution. Any projects developed under this subdivision (19)(A) shall be developed as the property of the authority and the authority shall make in lieu of tax payments on any such developments to the county and/or municipality in which it is domiciled. An authority, before issuing any industrial development bonds pursuant to this chapter, shall consider whether any proposed industrial operation is compatible with aviation purposes.

Subdivision (19)(A) does not apply:

To counties having a metropolitan form of government;

In any county having a population of not less than seven hundred seventy thousand (770,000) nor more than seven hundred eighty thousand (780,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

To any county having a population of not less than one hundred thousand (100,000) nor more than two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census; or

To counties with a population between two hundred eighty thousand (280,000) to two hundred ninety thousand (290,000).

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 7; T.C.A., § 42-707; Acts 1982, ch. 836, § 1; 1983, ch. 428, §§ 1, 3-5; 1984, ch. 853, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 25, 38.

Attorney General Opinions. State law authorizes an airport authority to charge parking fees to handicapped drivers along with other members of the general public, OAG 07-032 (3/23/07).

Cited: All American Cab Co. v. Metropolitan Knoxville Airport Authority, 547 F. Supp. 509, 1982 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14706 (E.D. Tenn. 1982).

42-4-108. Eminent domain.

Any participating or creating municipality may acquire any interest in land within the boundaries of the creating or participating municipality by gift, purchase, lease or condemnation, and may transfer such interest to an authority by sale, lease or gift. The transfer may be authorized by ordinance of the governing body of the municipality without submission of the question to the voters and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations, or other provisions contained in any other general, special, or local law.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 8; T.C.A., § 42-708.

42-4-109. Bonds.

An authority has the power to borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and issue its revenue bonds therefor, including revenue refunding bonds, in such form and upon such terms as it may determine, payable out of any revenues of the authority, including grants or contributions from the federal government or other sources, which bonds may be sold at public or private sale. Revenue bonds may be issued for the above purposes and the authority may pledge as security for the bonds all or any portion of the landing fees, concession fees, rents, charges, or any other revenues derived from the operation of the airport. Further, the payment or purchase of revenue bonds, if issued for an essential public purpose, may be additionally secured, in whole or in part, in the manner provided in this section, by a pledge of the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the creating municipality or any participating municipality. The revenue bonds and/or revenue refunding bonds shall be issued in the manner provided for a local government in title 9, chapter 21; provided, that any fees, rents, or charges so pledged that are fixed and established pursuant to the provisions of a lease or contract shall not be subject to revision or change except in the manner provided in the lease or contract. Any bonds of any authority issued pursuant to this chapter that are payable, as to principal and interest, solely from revenues of an airport or air navigation facility (and they shall so state on their face) shall not constitute a debt of any municipality, the state, or any political subdivision thereof, other than the authority or any municipality guaranteeing the payment or purchase of the bonds in the manner provided in this section, and shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction. Neither the commissioners of any authority nor any person executing such bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

An authority, creating municipality or any participating municipality may enter into interest rate exchange agreements with respect to any issue of revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds with any person under such terms and conditions as the authority, creating municipality or any participating municipality may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the authority, creating municipality or participating municipality to indemnify or otherwise pay any person for any loss of benefits under the agreement upon early termination thereof or default under the agreement.

In case any of the commissioners or officers of an authority whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be commissioners or officers after authorization but before the delivery of the bonds, the signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if the commissioners or officers had remained in office until delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable.

Any bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by an authority pursuant to this chapter and for a purpose or purposes authorized to be accomplished by this chapter shall be conclusively deemed, in any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of the bond or the security therefor, to have been issued pursuant to this chapter and for such purpose or purposes.

Bonds issued by an authority pursuant to this chapter are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose, and together with interest on the bonds and income from the bonds, shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation except for inheritance, transfer and estate taxes, and except as otherwise provided in this code.

The governing body of a creating municipality, or any participating municipality, may by resolution pledge the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the municipality as guarantor to the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, bonds of an authority, the purchase price of any such bonds subject to optional or mandatory tender for purchase, or the reimbursement or repayment to any bank or financial institution under any agreement providing for any draw, borrowing, advance or payment to be made for the payment of the principal, premium, interest or purchase price or the payment of amounts payable under any interest rate exchange agreement.

Prior to any meeting where any such guarantee will be considered by the governing body of a creating or participating municipality, a notice shall be published at least five (5) days in advance of such meeting in a newspaper of general circulation within the creating or participating municipality, describing the matter to be considered and containing an estimate of the dollar amount of any contingent liability proposed to be undertaken by the creating or participating municipality.

In the event of any such pledge of full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the municipality, any holder or holders of the bonds, including a trustee or trustees for holders of the bonds, any financial institution providing any agreement on the payment of principal, premium, interest, purchase price on the bonds or any party to any interest rate exchange agreement with respect to the bonds, shall have the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the holder's rights against the municipality so pledging, and the governing body of the municipality and any officer, agent, or employee of the municipality, including, but not limited to, the right to require the municipality and governing body and any proper officer, agent, or employee of the municipality, to assess, levy, and collect taxes and other revenues and charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, the taxes, revenues, and charges. The taxes herein authorized to be pledged shall be levied without limit as to rate or amount upon all taxable property within the municipality, and all such taxes to be levied are declared to have been levied for county and corporation purposes, respectively, within the meaning of the Constitution of Tennessee, article II, § 29.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 9; 1975, ch. 298, § 1; T.C.A., § 42-709; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 49; 1989, ch. 514, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Transfer, inheritance and estate taxes, title 67, ch. 8.

42-4-110. Civil service.

The authority, by action of its board, may elect to come under the civil service plan of the creating municipality, to be administered by the civil service commission or board of the municipality; or may adopt its own civil service plan to be administered by the board, which plan shall include, but need not be limited to, the following provisions:

Entry into the service on the basis of open competition; and service, promotions and remuneration on the basis of merit, efficiency and fitness;

Classifications of the positions in the service;

The rating of candidates on the basis of publicly announced job requirements and the maintenance of lists of eligible candidates;

Employment of candidates from the eligible lists in the highest qualified rating;

Probationary periods not to exceed six (6) months unless extended for disciplinary reasons;

Suspensions, demotions or discharge of employees for cause only with the right of notice and review;

Schedules of compensation and pay increases prepared by the president, or the president's designee, and approved by the board;

Promotion on the basis of ascertained merit, seniority in service, and satisfaction of job requirements;

Provision for keeping service records on all employees;

Regulations for hours of work, attendance, holidays, leaves of absence and transfers; and procedures for layoffs, discharge, suspension, discipline and reinstatement; and

Review by the board, or its designee pursuant to subsection (c), at the request of the employee in question and after notice and public hearing of disciplinary actions, including demotion, suspension in excess of five (5) days or discharge of any employee, which disciplinary actions, suspension or discharge may be affirmed or reversed. Findings of fact by the board shall not be subject to review by any court except for illegality or want of jurisdiction.

A civil service plan adopted and administered by the board may include a provision exempting from the plan those persons employed to render professional, scientific, technical or expert service of a temporary or unusual character; persons primarily employed on projects funded from the proceeds of bonds issued by the authority or from grants or loans to be repaid from the proceeds of bonds issued by the authority or from grants received by the authority; and persons employed for a period of less than six (6) months in any twelve-month period or working thirty (30) hours or less per week.

A civil service plan adopted and administered by the board may include a provision empowering the board to contract with the secretary of state for the use of administrative law judges duly appointed pursuant to § 4-5-102(1), or to delegate to any other designated persons, on a case-by-case basis, the authority to hear appeals and decide whether any disciplinary action taken should be affirmed or reversed.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 10; T.C.A., § 42-710; Acts 1984, ch. 853, § 3; 1998, ch. 744, § 1.

42-4-111. Certain powers of municipal corporations.

Any creating municipality and any participating municipality has all necessary powers in order to further the purposes of this chapter, any or all of which powers may be exercised by resolution of its governing body. Such powers include, without limitation, the power to:

Advance, donate or lend money or real or personal property to the authority;

Provide that any funds on hand or to become available to it for airport purposes shall be paid directly to the authority;

Cause water, sewer, gas, electric or other utility services to be provided to the authority's airport;

Sell, lease, dedicate, donate or otherwise convey to the authority any of its interest in any existing airport or other related property, or grant easements, licenses or other rights or privileges therein to the authority;

Open and improve streets, roads and alleys to the airport;

Provide police and fire protection services to the airport; and

Enter into agreements with the authority with regard to the transfer of its airport employees to the authority with the retention by such employees of any civil service status and accrued rights in pension, disability, hospitalization and death benefits.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 11; T.C.A., § 42-711.

42-4-112. Municipal zoning authority unaffected.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to limit any power of a municipality to regulate airport hazards by zoning.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 12; T.C.A., § 42-712.

42-4-113. Dissolution — Disposition of property.

Whenever the governing bodies of the creating municipality and the participating municipalities shall each by resolution determine that the purposes for which the authority was created have been substantially accomplished, that all of the bonds and other obligations of the authority have been fully paid, and that the municipalities have agreed on the distribution of the funds and other properties of the authority, then the executive officers of the municipalities shall execute and file for record with the secretary of state a joint certificate of dissolution reciting those facts and declaring the authority to be dissolved.

Upon filing the certificate, the authority shall be dissolved, and title to all funds and other properties of the authority at the time of the dissolution shall vest in and be delivered to such municipalities in accordance with the terms of their agreement relating thereto.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 13; T.C.A., § 42-713.

Attorney General Opinions. Dissolution of a municipal airport authority created under the Airport Authorities Act. OAG 16-14, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (4/5/2016).

42-4-114. Supplemental nature of chapter.

The powers conferred by this chapter are in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and are not in substitution for such powers, and the limitations imposed by this chapter shall not affect powers conferred by any other law.

The powers granted by this chapter may be exercised without regard to requirements, restrictions or procedural provisions contained in any other law or charter, except as expressly provided in this chapter.

Any metropolitan government or any home rule municipality authorized under this chapter to create a metropolitan airport authority may do so without the necessity of a charter amendment, notwithstanding anything in its charter to the contrary.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 14; T.C.A., § 42-714.

Attorney General Opinions. State law authorizes an airport authority to charge parking fees to handicapped drivers along with other members of the general public, OAG 07-032 (3/23/07).

Cited: Airport Inn v. Metropolitan Knoxville Airport Auth., 627 S.W.2d 949, 1981 Tenn. App. LEXIS 571 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1981).

42-4-115. Construction — Chapter controlling.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of this chapter, and insofar as this chapter may be inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, this chapter shall be controlling.

Acts 1969, ch. 174, § 16; T.C.A., § 42-715.

Cited: Airport Inn v. Metropolitan Knoxville Airport Auth., 627 S.W.2d 949, 1981 Tenn. App. LEXIS 571 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1981).